Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.340

Legislative office. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Legislative office" means the office of a member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

[ 2024 c 164 s 234.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.